Utah statutes.
78B-6-143.   Nonidentifying health history of adoptee filed with office -- Limited availability.

(1)  Upon finalization of an adoption in this state, the person who proceeded on behalf of the petitioner for adoption, or a child-placing agency if an agency is involved in the adoption, shall file a report with the office, in the form established by the office.  That report shall include a detailed health history, and a genetic and social history of the adoptee.

(2)  The report filed under Subsection (1) may not contain any information which identifies the adoptee's birth parents or members of their families.

(3)  When the report described in Subsection (1) is filed, a duplicate report shall be provided to the adoptive parents.

(4)  The report filed with the office under Subsection (1) shall only be available upon request, and upon presentation of positive identification, to the following persons:

(a)  the adoptive parents;

(b)  in the event of the death of the adoptive parents, the adoptee's legal guardian;

(c)  the adoptee;

(d)  in the event of the death of the adoptee, the adoptee's spouse, if the spouse is the parent or guardian of the adoptee's child;

(e)  the adoptee's child or descendant;

(f)  the adoptee's birth parent; and

(g)  the adoptee's adult sibling.

(5)  No information which identifies a birth parent or his family may be disclosed under this section.

(6)  The actual cost of providing information under this section shall be paid by the person requesting the information.

